Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.60.070

Damages, costs, and attorneys' fees—Joint and several liability. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

In any action brought under this title, the court may award to the commission all reasonable costs of investigation and trial, including reasonable attorneys' fees to be fixed by the court. If the violation is found to have been intentional, the amount of the judgment, which shall for this purpose include the costs, may be trebled as punitive damages. If damages or trebled damages are awarded in such an action brought against a lobbyist, the judgment may be awarded against the lobbyist, and the lobbyist's employer or employers joined as defendants, jointly, severally, or both. If the defendant prevails, he or she shall be awarded all costs of trial and may be awarded reasonable attorneys' fees to be fixed by the court and paid by the state of Washington.

[ 2024 c 164 s 496; 2018 c 304 s 17. Formerly RCW 42.17A.780.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 304: See note following RCW 29B.25.090.